Maryland, session 2026, HB0530.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force on Proactive Review of Audio and Video Recordings on
Special Education Buses.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee;
(4) the Secretary of Commerce, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Labor, or the Secretary’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0530*

HOUSE BILL 530
(6) the Secretary of Information Technology, or the Secretary’s designee;
(7) the chair of the Special Education State Advisory Committee, or the
chair’s designee; and
(8) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) two representatives of special education advocacy groups in the
State; and
(ii) two parents or guardians of special education students enrolled
in a public school in the State.
(c) The Governor shall appoint the chair of the Task Force.
(d) The State Department of Education shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) study using artificial intelligence tools to systematically and proactively
review audio and video recordings from special education buses to ensure the safety and
security of each student passenger;
(2) identify and analyze policies and procedures in other states or cities
that use artificial intelligence tools to systematically and proactively review audio and
video recordings of various educational settings, including student transportation, to
monitor student safety conditions or identify potential physical abuse, sexual harassment,
or sexual assault of students;
(3) study the current availability, quality, effectiveness, and costs of
implementing or improving audio and video recording capabilities on special education
buses in the State;
(4) examine existing policies and procedures for identifying, reporting, and
investigating incidents of physical abuse, sexual harassment, sexual assault, bullying or
harassment, or other issues on special education buses in the State;
(5) research best practices for the use of audio and video recording on buses
to prevent physical abuse, sexual harassment, sexual assault, bullying or harassment, or
other issues;

HOUSE BILL 530 3
(6) analyze challenges, including student privacy issues, related to the use
of audio and video recording on buses and the use of artificial intelligence tools for review;
(7) evaluate the costs of using artificial intelligence tools to review audio
and video recordings on special education buses, including a human review process to
ensure accuracy and effectiveness;
(8) evaluate the costs of implementing audio and video recording on all
special education buses; and
(9) consult with relevant stakeholders, including the Office of Pupil
Transportation and Emergency Management in the State Department of Education, the
Maryland School Bus Contractors Association, labor unions, the Maryland Association of
Pupil Transportation, disability rights organizations, and any other relevant persons.
(g) The Task Force shall make recommendations on:
(1) options for implementing or improving audio and video recording on
special education buses to ensure the safety and security of each student passenger,
including potential costs and funding sources;
(2) the feasibility of using specific artificial intelligence tools for the
systematic and proactive review of audio and video recordings on special education buses,
including potential costs and funding sources; and
(3) a process for notifying school leaders and parents or guardians of
students who may have been the victim of physical abuse, sexual harassment, sexual abuse,
bullying or harassment, or other identified issues.
(h) On or before December 1, 2026, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Senate Budget and Taxation Committee, the Senate Committee
on Education, Energy, and the Environment, the House Appropriations Committee, the
House Ways and Means Committee, and the General Assembly in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and, at the end of June 30, 2027, this
Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no
further force and effect.